Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1350.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2.2, to read: ARTICLE 2.2. OUTDOOR RX PROGRAM START_STATUTE36-165. Outdoor Rx program; grants; fees; rules A. Subject to available monies, The outdoor Rx program is established in the department to provide grants for outdoor environmental, ecological, agricultural or natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs serving the citizens of this state. B. The department may award grants to public agencies and contract with any public or private agency or person to develop and implement natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs under the outdoor Rx program. C. The department shall establish limits on the use of outdoor Rx program monies, which shall be described in the application package. The department may require applicants for a grant under this section to make a matching contribution to be eligible for a grant under this article. The department may limit the amount of funding available for any element of natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs. D. Each grant recipient shall: 1. Ensure that all natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs are conducted in accordance with any technical standards established by the department by rule. 2. Submit any reports required by the department as directed in the funding contract. 3. Agree to and certify compliance with all applicable federal and state laws, rules and policies. 4. Maintain accurate accounting records on the expenditure of program monies, provide the department with such records consistent with the agreement or on request, as applicable, and allow the department to audit the use of monies in accordance with generally accepted auditing practices and standards. E. The department shall reserve the right to terminate its participation in any program that fails to perform according to the requirements of this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. F. The Department may establish and assess fees to grant recipients or outdoor Rx program participants for outdoor Rx program services. G. The department shall adopt any rules necessary to implement and administer the outdoor Rx program.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-165.01. Advisory committee; membership; reimbursement; duties A. The Arizona state parks board shall establish an advisory committee to assist and advise the department of health services in developing and administering the outdoor Rx program. The advisory committee shall consist of at least seven members who are appointed as follows: 1. At least one member who is appointed by the executive director of the arizona state parks board. 2. At least one member who is appointed by the director of the department of health services. 3. At least one member who is appointed by the director of the department of veterans' services. 4. At least one member who is appointed by the director of the department of environmental quality. 5. At least one member of the business community who is appointed by the executive director of the arizona state parks board. 6. At least two members of outdoor organizations who are appointed by the executive director of the arizona state parks board. 7. Any other members the executive director of the arizona state parks board deems necessary to ensure a representative cross section of participants. B. Members of the advisory committee are not eligible for compensation but are eligible to receive reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2. C. The advisory committee shall develop an application form that eligible applicants must complete and submit to the department to be considered for a grant under the outdoor Rx program.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-165.02. Grant eligibility; priorities; criteria; selection A. The director shall set priorities and develop criteria for the awarding of grants to outdoor environmental, ecological, agricultural or natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs that, at a minimum: 1. Use veterans for at least fifty percent of the program's implementation or administration. 2. Contribute to healthy lifestyles through outdoor recreation. 3. Will commit matching and in-kind resources. 4. Create partnerships with public and private entities. 5. Maximize the number of participants who can be served, particularly participants who are veterans or who are recovering from substance abuse or physical or mental trauma. 6. Use a state park or other natural venue. 7. Use research-based and effective environmental, ecological, agricultural or natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy. 8. Provide citizens of this state with opportunities to directly experience and understand nature and the natural world. 9. Include ongoing program evaluation and assessment and reporting of program effectiveness. B. The director shall select programs that conduct any of the following eligible activities for the awarding of grants: 1. Outdoor recreation. 2. Outdoor environmental studies. 3. Agricultural activities. 4. Natural resource-based activities. 5. Conservation. 6. Ecological activities. 7. Stewardship or restoration. C. programs that conduct The following activities are ineligible to receive a grant from the outdoor Rx program: 1. Activities that may be perceived to lobby or advocate for political purposes. 2. Activities that are not in compliance with local, state or federal laws. 3. Organized youth sports, such as a community league or school team. D. The department shall evaluate each grant application on whether the program's proposals: 1. Provide for public or private partnerships. 2. Provide for innovative ways to increase the availability and use of outdoor recreation facilities. 3. Show consideration for the economics of installation or implementation to provide the greatest cost-to-benefit ratio, such as when private parties contribute more than the minimum amount. 4. Commit matching and in-kind resources. 5. Use a state park or other natural venue. 6. Contribute to healthy lifestyles through outdoor recreation and sound nutrition. 7. Contribute to the statewide network of outdoor recreation facilities or programs. 8. Encourage community involvement. 9. Encourage sound environmental practices. 10. Maximize the number of participants who can be served. 11. Provide an opportunity to experience the outdoors directly and understand nature and the natural world. 12. Include ongoing program evaluation and assessment and reporting of program effectiveness. 13. Make use of research-based and effective environmental, ecological, agricultural or natural resource-based therapy. 14. Demonstrate innovative approaches to outdoor-based therapy. E. the depArtment shall review Completed grant applications to determine eligibility and shall evaluate applications in accordance with the purposes, eligibility requirements, limitations and evaluation criteria prescribed in this article. The department shall consult with and consider the recommendations of the advisory committee established pursuant to section 36-165.01.  The director shall make the final decision on awarding grant monies to a natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy program.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-165.03. Outdoor Rx program fund The outdoor Rx program fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations and gifts, grants and donations. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used solely to administer the Outdoor Rx Program pursuant to this article. Monies in the fund may be granted to any state agency to develop and implement natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs consistent with this article. Monies in the Fund may be spent only for natural resource-based or outdoor-based therapy programs approved by the Director.END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-165.04. Annual report On or before February 1 of each year in which grants are made pursuant to this article, the department shall issue a report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. the report shall specify all of the following: 1. the total amount of grant monies that were awarded pursuant to this article in the preceding calendar year. 2. The name of each grant recipient. 3. The amount awarded to each grant recipient. 4. The purposes for which each grant was awarded. 5. A summary financial plan for the fund monies.END_STATUTE